Utah statutes.
48-2a-1005.   Security and costs.
In any action instituted in the right of any domestic or foreign limited
partnership, unless the unreturned contributions to the partnership property
of or allocable to the plaintiff amount to 5% or more of the unreturned
contributions of all limited partners, in their status as limited partners, or
the unreturned contributions of or allocable to the plaintiff have a market
value in excess of $25,000, the limited partnership in whose right the action
is brought shall be entitled, at any time before final judgment, to require
the plaintiff to give security for the costs and reasonable expenses which may
be directly attributable to and incurred by the limited partnership in the
defense of the action or may be incurred by other parties named as defendant
for which the limited partnership may become legally liable, but not including
attorneys' fees.  Market value shall be determined as of the date that the
plaintiff institutes the action or, in the case of an intervenor, as of the
date that he becomes a party to the action.  The amount and nature of the
security shall be determined by the court, and the amount of the security may
from time to time be increased or decreased, in the discretion of the court,
upon showing that the security provided has or may become inadequate or
excessive.  The limited partnership shall have recourse to the security in the
amount as the court having jurisdiction shall determine upon the termination
of such action if the court finds the action was brought without reasonable
cause.
